District of Columbia statutes.
31-3411

Investments.

With the exception of investments made in accordance with § 31-3404(a)(1), the funds of a health maintenance organization shall be invested in accordance with NAIC Health Maintenance Organization Investment Guidelines adopted by the Commissioner.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 12, 44 DCR 818

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4511.